Massachusetts, session 194th, H3020.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 33 of chapter 62C of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following new paragraph at the end thereof:—
(g) The provisions of this section include, but are not limited to, the waiver of interest and
penalties stated in this chapter for any veteran of the United States Armed Forces, as defined in
section 7 of chapter 4, who suffers from post traumatic stress syndrome as determined by the
Veterans Administration and whose delinquency resulted directly from effects of the disorder.
SECTION 2. The department of revenue shall implement a program providing
assistance to veterans of the United States Armed Forces, as defined in section 7 of chapter 4 of
of 2

the General Laws, who suffer from post traumatic stress disorder, as determined by the United
States Veterans Administration.
The assistance shall include, but not be limited to, providing training and assistance to
veterans and local veterans offices regarding basic tax information and how to contact the
department for assistance.
In addition, the department shall provide, within its Taxpayer Assistance Division,
resources for assisting qualified veterans in preparing their tax returns.
of 2